Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-443
Financial interest in inmate labor prohibited; violation; penalty.

No officer or employee of the Department of Correctional Services who has charge, control, or direction of any inmates shall be in any manner whatever financially interested in the work or profit of the labor of any inmate, and no such officer or employee shall receive any pay, gift, gratuity, or favor of a valuable character from any person interested either directly or indirectly in such labor. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. The offense may be reduced to a misdemeanor upon recommendation of the jury, if the court concurs in the recommendation. In such a case, the defendant shall be summarily discharged by the Director of Correctional Services.

Laws 1921, c. 285, § 2, p. 931;

C.S.1922, § 6974;

C.S.1929, § 83-911;

R.S.1943, § 83-443;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 48;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 314;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 38.